Hawaii statutes.
[§183B-1] Definitions. As used
in this chapter:

"Hawaiian fishponds" means the
unique, traditional system and methodology of aquaculture practiced by the
aboriginal people of Hawaii, and found nowhere else in the world. Generally
referred to as "loko i‘a", the system mastered by ancient Hawaiians
includes but is not limited to loko kuapa, loko umeiki, and loko pu‘uone. Loko
i‘a are natural or artificial enclosures; loko kuapa are enclosures built upon
a reef, loko umeiki are a type of permanent fish-trap structure, and loko pu‘uone
are enclosed by sand. The term does not include any fishpond designed in a
manner or constructed for purposes other than those associated with traditional
loko i‘a management and culture. [L 1995, c 177, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next